Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6787YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2381 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0w. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 280.37 relating to granting leaves of 4 absence to employees who hold a coaching authorization in the 5 same manner as a school district. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 9 requirements of section 280.37 relating to granting leaves of 10 absence to employees who hold a coaching authorization in the 11 same manner as a school district. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 280.37 Coaches ââ leave of absence for 13 professional training. 14 The board of directors of each school district and the 15 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school 16 shall grant each individual employed by the school district or 17 accredited nonpublic school who holds a coaching authorization 18 a leave of absence to attend professional development training 19 programs or coaches conferences that include training, without 20 loss of seniority, pay, vacation time, personal days, sick 21 leave, insurance and health coverage benefits, or earned 22 overtime accumulation, for not less than two days each school 23 year. 24